Nebraska, session 109, LB1019.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1019 LB1019
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-1311.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-1311.03 (1) On or before March 19 of each year, each county
assessor shall conduct a systematic inspection and review by class or
subclass of a portion of the taxable real property parcels in the county
for the purpose of achieving uniform and proportionate valuations and
assuring that the real property record data accurately reflects the
property, except beginning January 1, 2014, in any county with a
population of at least one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants according
to the most recent federal decennial census, the inspection and review
shall be conducted on or before March 25. The county assessor shall
adjust the value of all other taxable real property parcels by class or
subclass in the county so that the value of all real property is uniform
and proportionate. The county assessor shall determine the portion to be
inspected and reviewed each year to assure that all parcels of real
property in the county have been inspected and reviewed no less
frequently than every six years. Inspection of real property shall be
completed in the manner as directed by the county assessor.
(2) The county assessor, in the performance of his or her official
duties under this section, shall not be liable to prosecution for
trespass, except that the county assessor shall not enter an enclosed
building without the express permission of the property owner or
occupant.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-1311.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-